Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Miscellaneous Provisions

402.250.
Circuit Court may affirm or avoid marriage.

Where doubt is felt as to the validity of a marriage, either party may, by petition in Circuit Court, demand its avoidance or affirmance; but where one (1) of the parties was of the age of majority, as defined by KRS

2.015

at the time of marriage, the party who is of proper age may not bring such a proceeding for that cause against the party under age.

HISTORY:

2115: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 406, effective January 2, 1978; 2018 ch. 36, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

402.260.
Receivership for person under eighteen who marries without judicial consent. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2116: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 100, § 16; 1974, ch. 386, § 94; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 407, effective January 2, 1978; 1988, ch. 212, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 258, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2018 ch. 36, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

402.270.
Marriage manual — Preparation by Human Resources Coordinating Commission for distribution to marriage applicants.

The Human Resources Coordinating Commission of Kentucky shall prepare a marriage manual for distribution to all applicants for a marriage license. The manual shall include, but not be limited to, material on family planning, proper health and sanitation practices, nutrition, consumer economics, and the legal responsibilities of spouses to each other and as parents to their children.

When the manual is approved it shall be printed by the Human Resources Coordinating Commission. Copies of the manual shall be sent to the county clerk of each county. Each county clerk shall give a copy to each applicant for a marriage license.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 26, § 1; 1976, ch. 62, § 123.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Marriage License, § 5.1.